California, session 20252026, AB1154.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66333 of the Government Code is amended to read:66333. Notwithstanding Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314), a local agency may, by ordinance, provide for the creation of junior accessory dwelling units in single-family residential zones. The ordinance may require a permit to be obtained for the creation of a junior accessory dwelling unit, and shall do all of the following:(a) Limit the number of junior accessory dwelling units to one per residential lot zoned for single-family residences with a single-family residence built, or proposed to be built, on the lot.(b) If the junior accessory dwelling unit has shared sanitation facilities with the existing structure, require owner-occupancy in the single family residence in which the junior accessory dwelling unit will be permitted. The owner may reside in either the remaining portion of the structure or the newly created junior accessory dwelling unit. Owner-occupancy shall not be required if the junior accessory dwelling unit has separate sanitation facilities, or if the owner is another governmental agency, land trust, or housing organization.(c) Require the recordation of a deed restriction, which shall run with the land, shall be filed with the permitting agency, and shall include both of the following:(1) A prohibition on the sale of the junior accessory dwelling unit separate from the sale of the single-family residence, including a statement that the deed restriction may be enforced against future purchasers.(2) A restriction on the size and attributes of the junior accessory dwelling unit that conforms with this article.(d) Require a permitted junior accessory dwelling unit to be constructed within the walls of the proposed or existing single-family residence. For purposes of this subdivision, enclosed uses within the residence, such as attached garages, are considered a part of the proposed or existing single-family residence.(e) (1) Require a permitted junior accessory dwelling unit to include a separate entrance from the main entrance to the proposed or existing single-family residence.(2) If a permitted junior accessory dwelling unit does not include a separate bathroom, the permitted junior accessory dwelling unit shall include a separate entrance from the main entrance to the structure, with an interior entry to the main living area.(f) Require the permitted junior accessory dwelling unit to include an efficiency kitchen, which shall include all of the following:(1) A cooking facility with appliances.(2) A food preparation counter and storage cabinets that are of reasonable size in relation to the size of the junior accessory dwelling unit.(g) Require that a rental of a junior accessory dwelling unit be for a term longer than 30 days.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.